Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 318 (2) 91 nls/ko/md H.F. 318 Section 1. Section 514C.4A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. âCost-sharingâ means any coverage limit, 3 copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket cost 4 obligation imposed by a policy, contract, or plan providing for 5 third-party payment or prepayment of health or medical expenses 6 on a covered person. 7 Sec. 2. Section 514C.4A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. (1) Cost-sharing requirements imposed 10 for coverage required under this section shall not be less 11 favorable than cost-sharing requirements imposed by a health 12 carrier for screening mammograms. 13 (2) If a covered personâs policy, contract, or plan 14 providing for third-party payment or prepayment of health or 15 medical expenses qualifies as a high-deductible health plan 16 under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, subparagraph 17 (1) shall apply only after the covered person satisfies 18 the covered personâs minimum deductible, except for items 19 or services determined to be preventive care under section 20 223(2)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code. 21 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to third-party 22 payment provider contracts, policies, or plans delivered, 23 issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or 24 after January 1, 2026. 25 -1- HF 318 (2) 91 nls/ko/md 1/ 1